Hawaii statutes.
§196-42 State support for achieving
alternate fuels standards. The State shall facilitate the development of
alternate fuels and support the attainment of a statewide alternate fuels
standard of ten per cent of highway fuel demand to be provided by alternate
fuels by 2010, fifteen per cent by 2015, twenty per cent by 2020, and thirty
per cent by 2030. For purposes of the alternate fuels standard, ethanol
produced from cellulosic materials shall be considered the equivalent of two
and one-half gallons of noncellulosic ethanol. "Alternate fuels"
shall have the same meaning as contained in 10 Code of Federal Regulations Part
490; provided that it shall also include liquid or gaseous fuels produced from
renewable feedstocks such as organic wastes, or from water using electricity
from renewable energy sources. [L 2006, c 240, §5; am L 2010, c 175, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next